tr: E-okuyucu ekran teknolojisi: E-ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Diğer
ru: Технология экрана электронной книги: Электронные чернила; Электронные чернила Carta; Электронные чернила Pearl; Электронные чернила Triton; LCD; OLED; Другой
vi: Công nghệ hiển thị máy đọc sách điện tử: E-ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Khác
th: เทคโนโลยีจอแสดงผลอีรีดเดอร์: E-ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tecnologia do visor da leitor eletrónico: Tinta eletrónica; Tinta eletrónica Carta; Tinta eletrónica Pearl; Tinta eletrónica Triton; LCD; OLED; Outro
zh-TW: 電子閱讀器顯示技術: E-ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; 其他
bg-BG: Технология на дисплея на електронния четец: E-ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Други
hu: E-olvasó kijelzőjének technológiája: E-ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Egyéb
ko: E-리더 디스플레이 기술: E-ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; 기타
fr: Technologie d’affichage de la liseuse électronique: Encre électronique; Encre électronique Carta; Encre électronique Pearl; Encre électronique Triton; LCD; OLED; Autre
zh-CN: 电子阅读器显示屏技术: E-ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; 其他
hr-HR: Tehnologija zaslona čitača e-knjiga: E-papir; E-papir Carta; E-papir Pearl; E-papir Triton; LCD; OLED; Ostalo
en: E-reader display technology: E-ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Other
es: Tecnología de pantalla del libro electrónico: E-ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Otros
pt-BR: Tecnologia de exibição do e-reader: E-ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Outro
sv: Displayteknik för E-bokläsare: E-bläck; E-bläck Carta; E-bläck Pearl; E-bläck Triton; LCD; OLED; Annat
de: E-Reader-Displaytechnologie: E-Ink; E-Ink Carta; E-Ink Pearl; E-Ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Sonstiges
pl: Technologia wyświetlania e-czytnika: E-ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Pozostałe
lt-LT: El. skaityklės ekrano technologija: „E-ink“; „E-ink Carta“; „E-ink Pearl“; „E-ink Triton“; LCD; OLED; Kita
el: Τεχνολογία οθόνης αναγνώστη ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων: E-ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Άλλο
da: Skærmteknologi for E-læser: E-ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Andet
nb: E-leservisningsteknologi: E-ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Annen
sk-SK: Technológia obrazovky elektronickej čítačky: E-atrament; Karta E-atrament; E-atrament Pearl; E-atrament Triton; LCD; OLED; Iné
ja: 電子リーダーディスプレイ技術: E-ink; E Ink Carta; E Ink Pearl; E Ink Triton; LCD; 有機EL; その他
nl: Technologie beeldscherm e-readers: e-inkt; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Andere
fi: E-lukijan näyttötekniikka: E-Ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Muu
it: Tecnologia di visualizzazione dell'e-reader: E-ink; Carta E-ink; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Altro
cs: Zobrazovací technologie e-čtečky: Elektrický inkoust; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Jiné
sl-SI: Tehnologija zaslona e-bralnika: E-črnilo; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Drugo
ro-RO: Tehnologie afișaj e-reader: E-ink; E-ink Carta; E-ink Pearl; E-ink Triton; LCD; OLED; Altele